Wyoming statutes. Title 4 Trusts
Article 4. Creation, Validity, Modification and Termination of Trust

§ 4-10-401.
Methods of creating trust.

A trust may be created by:

Transfer of property to another person as trustee during the settlor’s lifetime or by will or other disposition taking effect upon the settlor’s death;

Declaration by the owner of property that the owner holds identifiable property as trustee;

Exercise of a power of appointment in favor of a trustee;

The court as provided in W.S. 3-3-607(a)(vi); or

An agent under a power of attorney where the express authority is designated with the appointment document and where the trust directs distribution upon the settlor’s death consistent with an existing will or other testamentary instrument or in absence thereof in accordance with the law of intestate succession as provided in W.S.

2-4-101

.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 4-10-402.
Title of trust property.

Property transferred to a trust shall be titled:

If it is real property, in accordance with W.S.

34-2-122

; and

If it is personal property, in:

The name of the current trustee as the trustee of such trust;

The name of “the trustee” as the trustee of such trust;

The name of the nominee of the trustee; or

The name of the trust.

Any reference to the trustee shall be deemed to include any successor or substitute trustee serving from time to time.

Any property of a husband and wife that is held by them as tenants by the entireties pursuant to W.S.

34-1-140

and conveyed to their joint revocable or irrevocable trusts, or to their separate revocable or irrevocable trusts, shall have the same immunity from the claims of their separate creditors as it would if it had remained held by the entireties, so long as:

They are both living and remain as husband and wife;

The property continues to be held in the trust or trusts for their benefit; and

The trust instrument, deed or other instrument of conveyance transferring the property to the trust or trusts provides that this subsection shall apply to the property and any proceeds resulting from the sale or disposition thereof.

After the death of the first of the husband and wife to die, all property held in trust that was immune from the claims of the decedent’s separate creditors under subsection (c) of this section immediately prior to the decedent’s death shall continue to have the same immunity from the claims of the decedent’s separate creditors as would have existed if the husband and wife had continued to hold the property conveyed in trust, or its proceeds, as tenants by the entirety.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or otherwise alter the authority granted to the department of health to assert a claim against an estate under W.S.

42-4-206

or to file a lien under W.S.

42-4-207

as could be asserted against a tenancy by the entirety established in accordance with W.S.

34-1-140

.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1; 2013 ch. 178, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the section by adding (c) through (e).

Validity of Medicaid lien. —

Department of Health asserted a valid lien against a house owned by a deceased Medicaid recipient and the recipient's spouse as tenants by the entirety, upon the spouse's death, because a tenancy by the entirety was an “other arrangement” within the recipient's Medicaid recovery “estate,” under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 42-4-206(g)(ii), as, otherwise, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 4-10-402(e) would be unnecessary. Estate of Marusich v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2013 WY 150, 313 P.3d 1272,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2013).

§ 4-10-403.
Requirements for creation.

A trust is created only if:

The settlor has capacity to create a trust;

The settlor indicates an intention to create the trust;

The trust has a definite beneficiary or is:

A charitable trust;

A trust for the care of an animal, as provided in W.S.

4-10-409

; or

A trust for a noncharitable purpose, as provided in W.S.

4-10-410

.

The trustee has duties to perform; and

The same person is not the sole trustee and sole beneficiary.

A beneficiary is definite if the beneficiary can be ascertained now or in the future, subject to W.S.

34-1-139

.

A power in a trustee, trust advisor, trust protector or other party designated in the trust instrument to select a beneficiary from an indefinite class is valid. If the power is not exercised within a reasonable time, the power fails and the property subject to the power passes to the persons who would have taken the property had the power not been conferred.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-404.
Trusts created in other jurisdictions.

A trust not created by will is validly created if its creation complies with the law of the jurisdiction in which the trust instrument was executed, or the law of the jurisdiction in which, at the time of creation:

The settlor was domiciled, had a place of abode, or was a national;

A trustee was domiciled or had a place of business; or

Any trust property was located.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 4-10-405.
Trust purposes.

A trust may be created only to the extent its purposes are lawful, not contrary to public policy, and possible to achieve. A trust and its terms shall be for the benefit of its beneficiaries.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

Proper purpose.—

Retention of a ranch that was also the trust asset was a proper material purpose where retention not unlawful, contrary to public policy, or impossible,and the trust had two distinct material purposes, i.e., retention of the ranch and providing a benefit to two beneficiaries. Shriners Hosps. for Children v. First Northern Bank of Wyo., 2016 WY 51, 373 P.3d 392,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 4-10-406.
Charitable purposes; enforcement.

A charitable trust may be created for the relief of poverty, the advancement of education or religion, the promotion of health, governmental or municipal purposes, or other purposes the achievement of which is beneficial to the community.

If the terms of a charitable trust do not indicate or otherwise provide for selection of a particular charitable purpose or beneficiary or if the designated charitable purpose cannot be completed or no longer exists, the court may select one (1) or more charitable purposes or beneficiaries. The selection shall be consistent with the settlor’s intention to the extent it can be ascertained.

The settlor of a charitable trust, among others, may maintain a proceeding to enforce the trust.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

Improper declaratory judgment complaint.—

Trustee's complaint for declaratory judgments that trusts were charitable trusts and tax exempt was properly dismissed because the complaint did not question the validity or construction of regulations or the construction or constitutionality of a statute, so (1) the complaint was an improper use of the Declaratory Judgments Act, and (2) the trustee did not exhaust available administrative remedies. Thomas Gilcrease Found. v. Cavallaro, 2017 WY 67, 397 P.3d 166,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 2017).

Primary jurisdiction. —

When a trustee asserted the trustee's trusts were charitable trusts and the trusts' property was exempt from taxation, the trustee's complaint was properly dismissed under the primary jurisdiction doctrine because county assessors had primary responsibility for making such determinations pursuant to a fact intensive investigation under Department of Revenue rules. Thomas Gilcrease Found. v. Cavallaro, 2017 WY 67, 397 P.3d 166,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 2017).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Standing of minister or member of religious society to seek enforcement, termination or proper administration of charitable trust, 94 ALR3d 1204.

Disposition of surplus trust income after payment of specific sum to charity, 96 ALR3d 954.

§ 4-10-407.
Creation of trust induced by fraud, duress or undue influence.

Subject to the rights of persons dealing with a fiduciary as provided in W.S.

4-10-1013

, a trust is void to the extent its creation was induced by fraud, duress or undue influence.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

Undue influence not found.

District court
properly granted summary judgment to a successor trustee because the
mother's amendments to her trust requiring a daughter to reimburse
an investment loss to the trust was not a debt that implicated the
statute of frauds and,although the mother consulted with her other
daughters about the amendments on isolated occasions, there was no
indication in the record that they unduly influenced her into amending
the trust. Meyer v. Miller, 2014 WY 91, 330 P.3d 263,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 2014).

§ 4-10-408.
Evidence of oral trust.

Except as required by a statute other than this act, a trust need not be evidenced by a trust instrument, but the creation of an oral trust and its terms may be established only by clear and convincing evidence.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 4-10-103(a)(xxvi).

§ 4-10-409.
Trust for care of animal.

A trust may be created to provide for the care of an animal alive during the settlor’s lifetime. The trust terminates upon the death of the animal or, if the trust was created to provide for the care of more than one (1) animal alive during the settlor’s lifetime, upon the death of the last surviving animal.

A trust authorized by this section may be enforced by a person appointed in the terms of the trust, trust advisor, trust protector or, if no person is so appointed, by a person appointed by the court. A person having an interest in the welfare of the animal may request the court to appoint a person to enforce the trust or to remove a person appointed.

Property of a trust authorized by this section may be applied only to its intended use, except to the extent the court determines that the value of the trust property exceeds the amount required for the intended use. Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, property not required for the intended use shall be distributed to the settlor, if then living, otherwise to the settlor’s successors in interest.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-410.
Noncharitable trust without ascertainable beneficiary.

Except as otherwise provided in W.S.

4-10-409

or by another statute, the following rules apply:

A trust may be created for a noncharitable purpose without a definite or definitely ascertainable beneficiary or for a noncharitable but otherwise valid purpose to be selected by the trustee;

A trust authorized by this section may be enforced by a trust advisor, trust protector, person appointed in the terms of the trust or, if no person is so appointed, by a person appointed by the court;

Property of a trust authorized by this section may be applied only to its intended use, except to the extent the court determines that the value of the trust property exceeds the amount required for the intended use. Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, property not required for the intended use shall be distributed to the settlor, if then living, otherwise to the settlor’s successors in interest;

No common law rule limiting the duration of noncharitable purpose trusts is in force in this state.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1; 2013 ch. 178, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added
“(iv) No common law rule limiting the duration of noncharitable purpose trusts is in force in this state.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 4-10-411.
Modification or termination of trust; proceedings for approval or disapproval.

In addition to the methods of termination prescribed by W.S.

4-10-412

through

4-10-415

, a trust terminates to the extent the trust is revoked or expires pursuant to its terms, no material purpose of the trust remains to be achieved or the purposes of the trust have become unlawful, contrary to public policy or impossible to achieve.

A proceeding to approve or disapprove a proposed modification or termination under W.S.

4-10-412

through

4-10-417

, or trust combination or division under W.S.

4-10-418

, may be commenced by a trustee or beneficiary, and a proceeding to approve or disapprove a proposed modification or termination under W.S.

4-10-412

may be commenced by the settlor. The settlor of a charitable trust may maintain a proceeding to modify the trust under W.S.

4-10-414

.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

Termination properly denied.—

Termination improper.—

Termination properly denied.—

It was no error to deny a co-trustee’s request to terminate a trust because res judicata barred the co-trustee’s claims, despite the co-trustee’s participation in the prior litigation in the co-trustee’s individual capacity and the co-trustee’s participation in the current litigation in the co-trustee’s representative capacity, as (1) the claims could have been raised in the prior litigation, and (2) the trust could achieve a viable material purpose. Redland v. Redland (In re Redland Family Trust), 2019 WY 17, 435 P.3d 349,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2019).

Termination improper.—

District court properly denied a petition to terminate the trust where retention of the ranch was at least a material purpose of the trust, retention of the ranch was not unlawful, contrary to public policy, or impossible, and the beneficiary's desires for greater income did not fit within the examples cited in the trust as reasons to sell the ranch. Shriners Hosps. for Children v. First Northern Bank of Wyo., 2016 WY 51, 373 P.3d 392,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 4-10-412.
Modification or termination of noncharitable irrevocable trust by consent.

If upon petition the court finds that the settlor and all qualified beneficiaries consent to the modification or termination of a noncharitable irrevocable trust, the court may enter an order approving the modification or termination, even if the modification or termination is inconsistent with a material purpose of the trust. A settlor’s power to consent to a modification or termination of a trust may be exercised by an agent under a power of attorney only to the extent expressly authorized by the power of attorney or the terms of the trust or, if no agent is so authorized, then by the settlor’s conservator or guardian. Exercise of the settlor’s power to consent by an agent, conservator or guardian shall be in each case with the approval of the court upon a finding by the court that such action is not inconsistent with the settlor’s purpose or intent.

A noncharitable irrevocable trust may be modified or terminated by a trust protector provided that the terms of the trust authorize a protector and grant the trust protector the power to modify or terminate the trust.

A noncharitable irrevocable trust may be terminated upon consent of all of the beneficiaries if the court concludes that continuance of the trust is not necessary to achieve any material purpose of the trust. A noncharitable irrevocable trust may be modified upon consent of all of the beneficiaries if the court concludes that modification is not inconsistent with a material purpose of the trust.

A spendthrift provision in the terms of the trust is not presumed to constitute a material purpose of the trust for purposes of this section.

Upon termination of a trust under subsection (a), (b) or (c) of this section, the trustee shall distribute the trust property as provided in the terms of the trust or in default of such terms of the trust as agreed by all the beneficiaries.

If not all the beneficiaries consent to a proposed modification or termination of the trust under subsection (a), (b) or (c) of this section, the modification or termination may be approved by the court if the court is satisfied that:

If all of the beneficiaries had consented, the trust could have been modified or terminated under this section; and

The interests of a beneficiary who does not consent will be adequately protected.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1; 2005, ch. 126, § 2; 2007, ch. 155, § 2.

The 2005 amendment

added the proviso at the beginning of
(a), and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2005, ch. 126, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “qualified” in (a).

Termination properly denied.—

It was no error to deny a co-trustee’s request to terminate a trust because res judicata barred the co-trustee’s claims, despite the co-trustee’s participation in the prior litigation in the co-trustee’s individual capacity and the co-trustee’s participation in the current litigation in the co-trustee’s representative capacity, as (1) the claims could have been raised in the prior litigation, and (2) the trust could achieve a viable material purpose. Redland v. Redland (In re Redland Family Trust), 2019 WY 17, 435 P.3d 349,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2019).

§ 4-10-413.
Modification or termination because of unanticipated circumstances or inability to administer trust effectively.

The court may modify the administrative or dispositive terms of a trust or terminate the trust if, because of circumstances not anticipated by the settlor, modification or termination will further the purposes of the trust. To the extent practicable, the modification shall be made in accordance with the settlor’s probable intention.

The court may modify the administrative terms of a trust if continuation of the trust on its existing terms would be impracticable or wasteful or impair the trust’s administration.

Upon termination of a trust under this section, the trustee shall distribute the trust property in a manner consistent with the purposes of the trust.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

Termination improper.

It was no error to deny a co-trustee’s request to terminate a trust because res judicata barred the co-trustee’s claims, despite the co-trustee’s participation in the prior litigation in the co-trustee’s individual capacity and the co-trustee’s participation in the current litigation in the co-trustee’s representative capacity, as (1) the claims could have been raised in the prior litigation, and (2) the trust could achieve a viable material purpose. Redland v. Redland (In re Redland Family Trust), 2019 WY 17, 435 P.3d 349,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2019).

Cited

in

Garwood v. Garwood, 2008 WY 129, 194 P.3d 319,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Oct. 22, 2008).

Termination improper.—

District court properly denied a petition to terminate the trust where retention of the ranch was at least a material purpose of the trust, retention of the ranch was not unlawful, contrary to public policy, or impossible, and the beneficiary's desires for greater income did not fit within the examples cited in the trust as reasons to sell the ranch. Shriners Hosps. for Children v. First Northern Bank of Wyo., 2016 WY 51, 373 P.3d 392,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 4-10-414.
Cy pres.

Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, if a particular charitable purpose becomes unlawful, impracticable, impossible to achieve or wasteful:

The trust does not fail, in whole or in part;

The trust property does not revert to the settlor or the settlor’s successors in interest; and

The court may apply cy pres to modify or terminate the trust by directing that the trust property be applied or distributed, in whole or in part, in a manner consistent with the settlor’s charitable purposes.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 4-10-415.
Modification or termination of uneconomic trust.

If the fair market value of a trust is less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00), the trustee may terminate the trust by the following procedure:

The trustee shall determine a plan of distribution that agrees, as nearly as possible, with the purposes of the trust;

The trustee shall give written notice to all qualified beneficiaries of his intent to distribute the assets in accordance with the plan unless a qualified beneficiary objects in writing within thirty (30) days after receipt of the notice;

If no objection is received within thirty (30) days after receipt of the notice, the trustee shall proceed to distribute the trust assets in accordance with the plan;

If the trustee receives a written objection to the plan within thirty (30) days after receipt of the notice, the trustee shall not distribute the assets of the trust, but may then petition the court for an order authorizing distribution in accordance with the plan. The court shall have plenary authority to approve, modify or reject the trustee’s petition.

The existence of a spendthrift or similar provision shall not affect the trustee’s powers under this section unless the trust instrument specifically provides that the trustee shall not have the power to terminate the trust.

This section does not apply to an easement for conservation or preservation.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

Cited

in

Garwood v. Garwood, 2008 WY 129, 194 P.3d 319,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Oct. 22, 2008).

Termination improper.

It was no error to deny a co-trustee’s request to terminate a trust because res judicata barred the co-trustee’s claims, despite the co-trustee’s participation in the prior litigation in the co-trustee’s individual capacity and the co-trustee’s participation in the current litigation in the co-trustee’s representative capacity, as (1) the claims could have been raised in the prior litigation, and (2) the trust could achieve a viable material purpose. Redland v. Redland (In re Redland Family Trust), 2019 WY 17, 435 P.3d 349,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2019).

§ 4-10-416.
Reformation to correct mistakes.

The court may reform the terms of a trust, even if unambiguous, to conform the terms to the settlor’s intention if it is proved by clear and convincing evidence that both the settlor’s intent and the terms of the trust were affected by a mistake of fact or law, whether in expression or inducement.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

Cited

in

Garwood v. Garwood, 2008 WY 129, 194 P.3d 319,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Oct. 22, 2008).

§ 4-10-417.
Modification to achieve settlor's tax objectives.

To achieve the settlor’s tax objectives, the court may modify the terms of a trust in a manner that is not contrary to the settlor’s probable intention as proved by a preponderance of the evidence. The court may provide that the modification has retroactive effect.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-418.
Combination and division of trusts.

After notice to the qualified beneficiaries, a trustee may combine two (2) or more trusts into a single trust or divide a trust into two (2) or more separate trusts, if the result does not impair the rights of any beneficiary or adversely affect achievement of the purposes of the trust.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.